Washington statutes.
RCW 43.102.110

Liability.

No action or other proceeding may be instituted against the director, an investigator, or an employee or contractor in the office or a person exercising powers or performing duties at the direction of the director for any act done in good faith in the execution or intended execution of the person's duty or for any alleged neglect or default in the execution in good faith of the person's duty.

[ 2021 c 318 s 311.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2021 c 318: See note following RCW 43.102.020.